Illinois, session 104th, HB1908.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Metropolitan Water Reclamation District Act 5is amended by changing Sections 4 and 4.13 as follows: 6    (70 ILCS 2605/4)  (from Ch. 42, par. 323)7    Sec. 4. The commissioners elected under this Act 8constitute a board of commissioners for the district by which 9they are elected, which board of commissioners is the 10corporate authority of the sanitary district, and, in addition 11to all other powers specified in this Act, shall establish the 12policies and goals of the sanitary district. The executive 13director, in addition to all other powers specified in this 14Act, shall manage and control all the affairs and property of 15the sanitary district and shall regularly report to the Board 16of Commissioners on the activities of the sanitary district in 17executing the policies and goals established by the board. At 18the regularly scheduled meeting of odd numbered years 19following the induction of new commissioners the board of 20commissioners shall elect from its own number a president and 21a vice-president to serve in the absence of the president, and 22the chairman of the committee on finance. The board shall 23provide by rule when a vacancy occurs in the office of the   HB1908 Enrolled- 2 -LRB104 06159 RTM 16193 b1president, vice-president, or the chairman of the committee on 2finance and the manner of filling such vacancy. 3    The board shall appoint from outside its own number the 4executive director and treasurer for the district. 5    The executive director must be a resident of the sanitary 6district and a citizen of the United States. He must be 7selected solely upon his administrative and technical 8qualifications and without regard to his political 9affiliations. 10    In the event of illness or other prolonged absence, death 11or resignation creating a vacancy in the office of the 12executive director, or treasurer, the board of commissioners 13may appoint an acting officer from outside its own number, to 14perform the duties and responsibilities of the office during 15the term of the absence or vacancy. 16    The executive director, with the advice and consent of the 17board of commissioners, shall appoint the director of 18engineering, director of maintenance and operations, director 19of human resources, director of procurement and materials 20management, clerk, general counsel, director of monitoring and 21research, and director of information technology. These 22constitute the heads of the Department of Engineering, 23Maintenance and Operations, Human Resources, Procurement and 24Materials Management, Finance, Law, Monitoring and Research, 25and Information Technology, respectively. No other departments 26or heads of departments may be created without subsequent   HB1908 Enrolled- 3 -LRB104 06159 RTM 16193 b1amendment to this Act. All such department heads are under the 2direct supervision of the executive director. 3    The executive director, with the advice and consent of the 4board of commissioners, may appoint a deputy executive 5director. The deputy executive director must be selected 6solely upon administrative and technical qualifications and 7without regard to political affiliations and shall serve under 8the direct supervision of the executive director. 9    The executive director, with the advice and consent of the 10board of commissioners, shall appoint a public and 11intergovernmental affairs officer and an administrative 12services officer. The public and intergovernmental affairs 13officer and administrative services officer shall serve under 14the direct supervision of the executive director. 15    The director of human resources must be qualified under 16Section 4.2a of this Act. 17    The director of procurement and materials management must 18be selected in accordance with Section 11.16 of this Act. 19    In the event of illness or other prolonged absence, death, 20or resignation creating a vacancy in the office of director of 21engineering, director of maintenance and operations, director 22of human resources, director of procurement and materials 23management, clerk, general counsel, director of monitoring and 24research, public and intergovernmental affairs officer, 25administrative services officer, or director of information 26technology, the executive director shall appoint an acting   HB1908 Enrolled- 4 -LRB104 06159 RTM 16193 b1officer to perform the duties and responsibilities of the 2office during the term of the absence or vacancy. Any such 3officers appointed in an acting capacity are under the direct 4supervision of the executive director. 5    All appointive officers and acting officers shall give 6bond as may be required by the board. 7    The executive director, treasurer, acting executive 8director, and acting treasurer hold their offices at the 9pleasure of the board of commissioners. 10    The acting director of engineering, acting director of 11maintenance and operations, acting director of human 12resources, acting director of procurement and materials 13management, acting clerk, acting general counsel, acting 14director of monitoring and research, acting public and 15intergovernmental affairs officer, acting administrative 16services officer, and acting director of information 17technology, and deputy executive director hold their offices 18at the pleasure of the executive director. 19    The director of engineering, director of maintenance and 20operations, director of human resources, director of 21procurement and materials management, clerk, general counsel, 22director of monitoring and research, public and 23intergovernmental affairs officer, administrative services 24officer, and director of information technology may be removed 25from office for cause by the executive director. Prior to 26removal, such officers are entitled to a public hearing before   HB1908 Enrolled- 5 -LRB104 06159 RTM 16193 b1the executive director at which hearing they may be 2represented by counsel. Before the hearing, the executive 3director shall notify the board of commissioners of the date, 4time, place and nature of the hearing. 5    In addition to the general counsel appointed by the 6executive director, the board of commissioners may appoint 7from outside its own number an attorney, or retain counsel, to 8advise the board of commissioners with respect to its powers 9and duties and with respect to legal questions and matters of 10policy for which the board of commissioners is responsible. 11    The executive director is the chief administrative officer 12of the district, has supervision over and is responsible for 13all administrative and operational matters of the sanitary 14district including the duties of all employees which are not 15otherwise designated by law, and is the appointing authority 16as specified in Section 4.11 of this Act. 17    The board of commissioners shall appoint from outside its 18own number an Inspector General or enter into an 19intergovernmental agreement with another unit of local 20government for the appointment of an Inspector General. The 21board of commissioners shall establish minimum qualifications 22and duties for the Inspector General by ordinance or 23intergovernmental agreement. 24    The board, through the budget process, shall set the 25compensation of all the officers and employees of the sanitary 26district. Any incumbent of the office of president may appoint   HB1908 Enrolled- 6 -LRB104 06159 RTM 16193 b1an administrative aide which appointment remains in force 2during his incumbency unless revoked by the president. 3    Effective upon the election in January, 1985 of the 4president and vice-president of the board of commissioners and 5the chairman of the committee on finance, the annual salary of 6the president shall be $37,500 and shall be increased to 7$39,500 in January, 1987, $41,500 in January, 1989, $50,000 in 8January, 1991, and $60,000 in January, 2001; the annual salary 9of the vice-president shall be $35,000 and shall be increased 10to $37,000 in January, 1987, $39,000 in January, 1989, $45,000 11in January, 1991, and $55,000 in January, 2001; the annual 12salary of the chairman of the committee on finance shall be 13$32,500 and shall be increased to $34,500 in January, 1987, 14$36,500 in January, 1989, $45,000 in January, 1991, and 15$55,000 in January, 2001. 16    The annual salaries of the other members of the Board 17shall be as follows: 18        For the three members elected in November, 1980, 19    $26,500 per annum for the first two years of the term; 20    $28,000 per annum for the next two years of the term and 21    $30,000 per annum for the last two years. 22        For the three members elected in November, 1982, 23    $28,000 per annum for the first two years of the term and 24    $30,000 per annum thereafter. 25        For members elected in November, 1984, $30,000 per 26    annum.   HB1908 Enrolled- 7 -LRB104 06159 RTM 16193 b1        For the three members elected in November, 1986, 2    $32,000 for each of the first two years of the term, 3    $34,000 for each of the next two years and $36,000 for the 4    last two years; 5        For three members elected in November, 1988, $34,000 6    for each of the first two years of the term and $36,000 for 7    each year thereafter. 8        For members elected in November, 1990, 1992, 1994, 9    1996, or 1998, $40,000. 10        For members elected in November, 2000 and thereafter, 11    $50,000. 12    Notwithstanding the other provisions of this Section, the 13board, prior to January 1, 2007 and with a two-thirds vote, may 14increase the annual rate of compensation at a separate flat 15amount for each of the following: the president, the 16vice-president, the chairman of the committee on finance, and 17the other members; the increased annual rate of compensation 18shall apply to all such officers and members whose terms as 19members of the board commence after the increase in 20compensation is adopted by the board. 21    The board of commissioners has full power to pass all 22necessary ordinances, orders, rules, resolutions and 23regulations for the proper management and conduct of the 24business of the board of commissioners and the corporation and 25for carrying into effect the object for which the sanitary 26district is formed. All ordinances, orders, rules, resolutions   HB1908 Enrolled- 8 -LRB104 06159 RTM 16193 b1and regulations passed by the board of commissioners must, 2before they take effect, be approved by the president of the 3board of commissioners. If he approves thereof, he shall sign 4them, and such as he does not approve he shall return to the 5board of commissioners with his objections in writing at the 6next regular meeting of the board of commissioners occurring 7after the passage thereof. Such veto may extend to any one or 8more items or appropriations contained in any ordinance making 9an appropriation, or to the entire ordinance. If the veto 10extends to a part of such ordinance, the residue takes effect. 11If the president of such board of commissioners fails to 12return any ordinance, order, rule, resolution or regulation 13with his objections thereto in the time required, he is deemed 14to have approved it, and it takes effect accordingly. Upon the 15return of any ordinance, order, rule, resolution, or 16regulation by the president, the vote by which it was passed 17must be reconsidered by the board of commissioners, and if 18upon such reconsideration two-thirds of all the members agree 19by yeas and nays to pass it, it takes effect notwithstanding 20the president's refusal to approve thereof. 21    It is the policy of this State that all powers granted, 22either expressly or by necessary implication, by this Act or 23any other Illinois statute to the District may be exercised by 24the District notwithstanding effects on competition. It is the 25intention of the General Assembly that the "State action 26exemption" to the application of federal antitrust statutes be   HB1908 Enrolled- 9 -LRB104 06159 RTM 16193 b1fully available to the District to the extent its activities 2are authorized by law as stated herein. 3(Source: P.A. 102-808, eff. 5-13-22.) 4    (70 ILCS 2605/4.13)  (from Ch. 42, par. 323.13)5    Sec. 4.13. The following offices and places of employment, 6insofar as there are or may be such in the sanitary district, 7shall not be included within the classified civil service: All 8elective officers, the deputy executive director, the director 9of human resources, the clerk, treasurer, director of 10engineering, general counsel, executive director, director of 11maintenance and operations, director of procurement and 12materials management, director of monitoring and research, 13director of information technology, public and 14intergovernmental affairs officer, administrative services 15officer, and secretary and administrative aide to the 16president of the board of trustees, members of the civil 17service board and special examiners appointed by the civil 18service board and the aides secretaries to the officers and 19individual trustees, and those employed for periods not 20exceeding 5 years under any apprentice program, training or 21intern programs funded wholly or in part by grants from the 22State of Illinois or the United States of America. Further, 23apprentices in a sanitary district apprenticeship program for 24the trades shall not be included within the classified civil 25service. Entry into a sanitary district apprenticeship program   HB1908 Enrolled- 10 -LRB104 06159 RTM 16193 b1for the trades shall be by lottery. Graduates of a sanitary 2district apprenticeship program for the trades shall be given 3additional points, in an amount to be determined by the 4Director of Human Resources, on examinations for civil service 5journeymen positions in the trades at the sanitary district.6(Source: P.A. 99-736, eff. 1-1-17.)